California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   (AB 2594)   Effective September 21, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.5.

The policy is not required to be used for reinsurance between insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

Either the blanks in the standard form or those in an endorsement attached thereto shall be appropriately filled. The first page of the policy or an endorsement attached thereto may be arranged to show in schedule form the amounts of insurance, rates and premiums for the basic coverages insured under the standard form of policy and additional coverages or perils insured under endorsements attached, and such other data as may be conveniently included for duplication on daily reports for office records.

If such a schedule clearly shows the amount at risk, the rate, and the premium in respect of fire insurance, the words, “the above
 specified” may be inserted in the blanks preceding the word “dollars” in the two places in which “dollars” appears in that portion of the standard form which precedes the countersignature clause, or in identical blanks in an endorsement attached to the standard form and containing the paragraph in the standard form in which the blanks appear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.5.

In lieu of showing the term of coverage in the form set forth in Section 6010, the standard form policy may show the term in any form which clearly states the period during which the insurance is to continue. The period shall begin and end on specified dates at 12:01 a.m., standard time, at the location of the property involved. An example of permissible method of showing the term is: 
“ for the term offromAt 12:01 a.m.(Standard Time) toAt 12:01 a.m.(Standard Time)at location of property involved, ”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.6.

In lieu of the attestation clause and official signatures in the form as set forth in Section 6010, the standard form policy may show, immediately following the policy provisions, the following:

“In witness whereof, this company has executed and attested these presents; but this policy shall not be valid unless countersigned by the duly authorized secretary of this company at ______.SecretaryPresident”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.

By special agreement indorsed on the policy or added thereto, the provisions regarding appraisement or apportionment of loss may be waived and the valuations of all or any of the insured property in case of total loss may be agreed upon in advance of loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.

The standard form of policy shall be plainly printed. The type shall not be smaller than eight-point and in a style not less legible than Century and subheads shall be in type larger than eight-point and in a style not less legible than Century. The lines of the policy following the countersignature clause shall be numbered consecutively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

6014.

All county mutual fire insurance policies on subject matter in this State shall be on the county mutual standard form and, except as provided by this article, shall not contain additions thereto. Except as provided in Section 6017, no part of the standard form shall be omitted from the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

6015.

The insurer may add to the policy any matter relating to its financial condition, directors, officers, members and history, and the address of its home office and principal office in the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

Clauses may be added to the policy providing for and defining the rights, duties and obligations of mortgagees, assignees, and other parties having an interest in, right to or lien upon the insured subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6017.

Insurers authorized to limit or eliminate their assessment liability in accordance with the terms of this chapter may make such changes in the standard form as will properly accomplish that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

6017.5.

Insurers authorized to eliminate their assessment liability in accordance with the terms of this chapter may use the California standard form insurance policy in lieu of the standard form prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1553.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.

No clause shall be inserted nor rider attached affecting the standard form liability of the insurer for loss or damage by fire occasioned either directly or indirectly by earthquake, hurricane, volcanic action or other disturbance of nature, unless such rider or clause is printed in red ink in type larger than pica or in capital letters measuring not less than eight one-hundredths (8/100's) of an inch in height, and unless there is printed at the head of the policy in red ink and in large bold-faced type the words: “This policy contains limitations of liability not permitted in the California standard form.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6019.

Clauses may be added to the policy:

(a) Covering property and risks not otherwise covered; provided that clauses covering loss or damage caused by nuclear reaction, nuclear radiation or radioactive contamination, all whether directly or indirectly resulting from an insured peril under the standard policy issued pursuant to Section 6010 may be insured under said policy only by a written endorsement providing such insurance, with such endorsement affixed to said standard policy.

(b) Assuming greater liability than is otherwise imposed on the
 insurer.

(c) Granting the insured permits and privileges not otherwise provided.

(d) Waivers of any of the matters voiding the policy or suspending the insurance.

(e) Waivers of any of the requirements imposed on the insured after loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

6020.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, clauses may be attached, by separate riders in type larger than pica or in capital letters measuring not less than eight one-hundredths (8/100's) of an inch in height, to the policy, imposing specified duties and obligations upon the insured and limiting the liability of the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

It is a misdemeanor for any insurer or its agent to countersign or issue a county mutual fire insurance policy covering in whole or part subject-matter in this State in violation of this article. Any policy so issued shall notwithstanding be binding upon the issuing insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Risks [6040. - 6050.]

6040.

Such insurer may issue policies on dwellings, schoolhouses, churches, fraternal or lodge halls, community, creamery, or farm buildings and property contained in or on such premises or owned by the insured and stored in public or private warehouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1904.)
-------------------------------------------

6040.5.

Insurers authorized to eliminate their assessment liability in accordance with the terms of this chapter (commencing with Section 5050) shall not be restricted as to the type of risks they may insure by the provisions of Section 6040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 464.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.

Insurance permitted by this chapter upon personal property owned by the insured, including automobiles and livestock, shall continue in full force and effect during the use or transportation of the property in the ordinary course of the insured’s affairs if the primary situs of the property is located at the time of loss within this State. Otherwise such insurance is governed by Section 6048.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

6042.

Policies may be executed for any time not exceeding five years and not extending beyond the time limited for the existence of the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6043.

All members of such an insurer shall agree in writing to pay their pro rata share to the insurer of the necessary expense and loss sustained by any member thereof during the time for which their respective policies are in force. They shall also, at the time of effecting the insurance, pay the insurer such percentage of the estimated cost and such other charges as are required by law or the insurer’s rules and by-laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

6044.

All such insurers shall classify the subject matter insured by them at the time of issuing policies thereon. Such classification shall be under rates corresponding as nearly as practicable to the greater or less risk from loss attached to the several kinds of subject matter insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

6045.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(a) “A city or town block” is an area of not more than one hundred sixty thousand square feet having at least one frontage in a closely built up district fronting on a used public highway, surrounded on all sides by a clear space at least equal in width to the clear space of such public highway.

(b) “Closely built up district” means territory abutting a public highway where for not less than a quarter of a mile the buildings average less than one hundred feet apart.

(c) “One risk” means one hazard under one or more policies, subject to one fire and relates to the amount named in the policy or policies.

(d) “Clear space” means space free from combustible material likely to communicate fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.

Except as provided in this section, such insurer shall not issue policies to an amount in excess of six thousand dollars ($6,000) on any one risk, whether under one or more policies, without immediately reinsuring the excess amount in some other insurer. Any such insurer having more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) direct insurance in force as shown by its books may, for each one million dollars ($1,000,000) in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), write five hundred dollars ($500) additional insurance in excess of six thousand dollars ($6,000) on each such risk; provided, however, that any such insurer 90 percent of whose business in force is reinsurance assumed and which has more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) gross insurance in force may, for each one million dollars ($1,000,000) in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), write five hundred dollars ($500) additional insurance in excess of six thousand dollars ($6,000) on each such risk. Any such insurer issuing nonassessable policies as provided in Section 7015 (c) (3) hereof, may issue policies in accordance with Section 3080 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

6048.

Except as provided in Section 6041 such insurer shall insure only property within the limits of the county wherein it is organized, or in a county next adjoining the county of organization. In the event that no such insurer may, under the provisions of the preceding sentence, insure property in a county contiguous to the said next adjoining county, then such insurer may also insure property in the said contiguous county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 817.)
-------------------------------------------

6049.

Such an insurer shall not assume any risks on property situated within any one block of a closely built-up district or of territory within the limit of any incorporated city, unless on a single risk in such block it immediately reinsures all of the amount at risk which is in excess of the limit provided in this article or unless in the case of more than one risk in any such block it immediately reinsures all of the amount at risk which is in excess of one-quarter of 1 percent of its direct amount of insurance in force; provided, however, that any such insurer 90 percent of whose business in force is reinsurance assumed, and which has more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) gross insurance in force, in the case of more than one risk in any such block, shall immediately reinsure all of the amount at risk which is in excess of one-quarter of 1 percent of its net amount of insurance in force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1390.)
-------------------------------------------

6050.

Where the amount of insurance in policies already written equals the amount limited by the provisions of this article, no additional insurance shall be written by such insurer on country property within a radius of one hundred feet of an existing risk. Such radius shall continue at not less than seventy-five feet during the life of the policy, unless insurance within the radius is covered by reinsurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reinsurance [6070. - 6072.]

6070.

Any such insurer may accept reinsurance under any agreement for reinsurance between two or more county mutual fire insurers or from any authorized insurer the stock of which is wholly owned by county mutual insurers. In any such case the reinsurance accepted by any one insurer shall not exceed the amount of risk retained by the insurer originating the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.

Any such insurer may cede reinsurance provided the amount retained by the originating insurer shall be not less than 10 percent nor less than five hundred dollars ($500); provided, however, that the minimum required hereunder shall never exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000).

The applicable provisions of Sections 922.1 to 922.8 inclusive shall govern for the purposes of testing the solvency and preparing the annual statement of the ceding insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

6072.

The restrictions imposed by this chapter upon any insurer as to original insurance shall apply to reinsurance written by it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Loss [6090. - 6091.]

6090.

Every member of such insurer who sustains loss by any hazard covered by his policy shall immediately notify the insurer in accordance with the terms of his policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

6091.

An action may be brought and maintained against any such insurer by its members to recover for losses insured against by the insurer, if payment is withheld after the amount of such losses is determined, and is due by the terms of the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Assessments [7010. - 7018.]

7010.

When any loss exceeds in amount the cash funds of the insurer and also exceeds one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of the insurer’s insurance in force, its president shall convene its directors to make an assessment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.

Upon being convened for the purpose, the directors shall make an assessment upon all of the property insured in the insurer. Such assessment shall be in proportion to the amount for which each piece of property is insured, taken in connection with the rate of premium under which it is classified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7012.

When the amount of such loss does not exceed one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of insurance in force in the insurer, its directors may, by resolution in writing signed by two-thirds of all the directors while present at a meeting, borrow money in the name of the insurer and give its evidence of indebtedness therefor, in a total amount not exceeding one-eighth of one per cent of the total amount of insurance thus in force.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7013.

The term of any such loan shall not be greater than twelve months nor shall the date of maturity be in excess of thirty days beyond the date of the next annual meeting of the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7014.

The board of directors may at its annual meeting levy an assessment not to exceed twenty-five cents on the $100 of the first class of insurance and a pro rata amount on lower classes. The sum so raised shall constitute a reserve fund to be used in emergency cases only. Another assessment for this fund shall not be made while this reserve fund remains intact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7015.

(a) No assessment or assessments may be levied upon any policy in excess of three times the amount of the premium named therein. The liability to assessment on any policy may be further reduced or eliminated as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e).

(b) Upon written request, and if the commissioner finds that an insurer has a surplus of admitted assets over liabilities of at least:

(1) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(2) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or

(3) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); he or she shall issue his or her certificate stating that the insurer has a surplus of at least $____, but less than $____, filling in the applicable amounts, or of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), as the case may be.

(c) If, when a policy is issued, there is in force an unrevoked certificate issued by the commissioner stating that the insurer has a surplus of admitted assets over liabilities of at least:

(1) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), no assessment or assessments may be levied on the policy in excess of twice the amount of the premium named therein.

(2) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), no assessment or assessments may be levied on the policy in excess of a sum equal to the amount of the premium stated therein.

(3) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), no assessment or assessments may be levied on the policy.

(d) Whenever the commissioner finds that the surplus of the insurer is less than the minimum specified in an outstanding certificate he or she shall revoke the certificate.

(e) Upon revocation of the certificate no policy shall thereafter be issued nor be permitted to remain in force beyond the date fixed for the next payment of premium without provision therein or endorsement thereon providing for that assessment liability as may be applicable at the time of issuance or at the time for the payment of the premium.

(f) As used in this section “liabilities” includes liabilities for losses reported, expenses, taxes and all other indebtedness, and provision for reinsuring all outstanding risks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 315, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7015.5.

The commissioner shall charge and collect in advance a fee of one hundred seventy-seven dollars ($177) for issuing a certificate under this article, or for reissuing and amending or changing an obsolete certificate at the request of an insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 55.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7016.

The secretary, whenever such an assessment is made, shall immediately notify every policyholder in such insurer either personally, by agent, or by letter directed to the policyholder’s usual post-office address, stating:

(a) The amount of the loss.

(b) The sum due from the policyholder as his share.

(c) To whom such payment is to be made.

(d) The time when the payment is to be made. Such time shall not be less than thirty days nor more than ninety days from the date of mailing notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7017.

The insurer may bring an action against any member who neglects or refuses to pay an assessment made upon him under the provisions of this chapter, or to pay other liabilities due the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7018.

A director of any such insurer who wilfully refuses or neglects to perform the duties imposed upon him by law or by the insurer’s by-laws shall be liable in his individual capacity to the person sustaining a loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reports and Statements [7030. - 7031.]

7030.

The secretary shall prepare an annual statement, showing the condition of such insurer on December thirty-first preceding the annual meeting. He shall present the statement at the annual meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.

The president and secretary shall, on or before the first day of March of each year, prepare, under oath, and transmit to the commissioner a statement of the condition of the insurer as of the thirty-first day of December then next preceding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Merger [7040. - 7044.5.]

7040.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 900 of the Corporations Code, any two or more of such insurers may merge. The plan and agreement by which any such merger is to be effected shall be submitted to the commissioner who shall examine the same and may require such provisions to be inserted in the agreement and such actions to be taken in connection with the merger (including but not limited to: (1) the terms of the merger, (2) the terms of the notice of the vote by the members of each such insurer on the merger, and (3) the manner and form of voting thereon by the members of each such insurer) as he may deem necessary in order that the transaction shall be mutually fair and equitable between the respective members and policyholders of the companies parties to the merger. The commissioner shall not approve any such plan and agreement if the bylaws of any insurer party to the merger have been amended within one year prior to the date of filing of such plan and agreement with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

7041.

When any such plan and agreement shall have been approved by the commissioner, with changes, if any required by him, the same shall be approved by a vote of not less than two-thirds of the members voting at a meeting of the members of each such insurer involved at which there shall be present in person or by proxy at least 10 percent of the members entitled to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1963.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.

If the vote is in the affirmative a certified copy of all proceedings relating to the proposed merger shall be filed with the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with the law and his or her requirements, he or she shall issue his or her certificate approving the plan and agreement and the merger shall become effective when the certificate, the agreement, and any other documents required by law have been filed with the Secretary of State.

The fee for issuing a certificate approving the merger shall be three hundred nine dollars ($309) for the original certificate, payable in advance, with the filing of the first merger papers with the commissioner; and nine dollars ($9) shall be charged for each signed and sealed or
 certified copy thereof issued as part of the same transaction in which the original certificate is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 56.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7043.

After any merger made under the provisions of this article shall have been completed, the surviving corporation shall be deemed, for the purpose of the territorial limit provided in Section 6048, to have been organized not only in its county of organization but also in the county of organization of the county mutual insurer which was merged into it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1963.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.

Any plan of merger under this article shall provide that all rights and properties of the parties to the plan of merger shall accrue to and become the rights and properties of the surviving corporation, which surviving corporation shall succeed to and assume all the obligations and liabilities of the merged corporations in the same manner as if incurred or contracted by the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1963.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.5.

Any one or more county mutual fire insurers, by following the procedure of this article, may merge into a general mutual insurer described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4010) of Part 1, Division 2 of this code. Such general mutual insurer shall become the surviving corporation.

Any two or more county mutual fire insurers may merge, concurrently with the transformation of one of the constituent corporations under Article 9.6 (commencing with Section 7045) of Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 2 into a general mutual insurer. The constituent transformed into a general mutual insurer shall be the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.6. Transformation [7045. - 7049.]

7045.

The board of directors of any county mutual fire insurer that desires to commence proceedings for transformation of that insurer to a general mutual insurer shall adopt a resolution to that effect and submit to the commissioner a plan for effecting that transformation accompanied by an application for approval thereof and a fee of four hundred ninety-four dollars ($494).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 57.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7046.

After the commissioner has granted tentative approval of any such application, a county mutual fire insurer that shall meet the financial requirements applicable to other insurers under Article 3 (commencing with Section 699), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, may by the majority vote of those of its policyholders voting at a meeting duly called for the purpose, elect to transform itself into a general mutual insurer as defined in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4010) of Part 1, Division 2 and amend its articles of incorporation and bylaws to conform to, cover, and enjoy any or all of the provisions, powers, rights, and privileges of such a mutual insurer, notwithstanding the restrictions or limitations of any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 900 of the Corporations Code. No such transformed county mutual fire insurer may engage in the business of life, title, mortgage, or mortgage guarantee insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

7047.

The meeting called for the purpose of transformation, shall be preceded by a written or printed notice of the meeting and its purpose addressed to each policyholder of record on the date of the notice, mailed at least 30 days before that date fixed for the meeting. The presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of the policyholders entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum unless a higher percentage is required by the bylaws or articles of incorporation of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

7048.

Such corporation shall be a continuance of the original corporation by the same name or by any other name approved by the commissioner. Such transformation, however, shall in no way annul, modify or change any of the existing contracts and liabilities of such corporations, and any and all such contracts and liabilities shall continue in force and effect the same as though such corporation had not transformed or qualified under this article, nor shall such transformation in any way prejudice, impede or impair any pending action or proceeding or any rights previously acquired. Certified copies of all proceedings in connection with such transformation, together with a certified copy of the articles of incorporation as amended, shall be filed with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

7049.

After the policyholders have elected such a transformation a county mutual insurer shall submit to the insurance commissioner for final approval of the transformation a certified copy of all proceedings together with an application for a new certificate of authority accompanied by the necessary filing fee. The said transformation shall become effective upon the occurrence of the last of the three following events: (1) the final approval by the insurance commissioner, (2) the issuance of a new certificate of authority, and (3) the filing of certified copies of amended articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Dissolution [7050. - 7050.]

7050.

Any such insurer may be proceeded against and dissolved in the same manner and upon the same conditions as in the case of other domestic incorporated insurers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Exemptions [7060. - 7060.]

7060.

The provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 381 and the provisions of Sections 382, 383, 384, 750, 751, 752, 753, 754, 755, 756, 757, 758, 759, 761, 762, 763, 764, 765, 766, 800, 801, 802, 803, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809, 980, 981, 982, 983, 984, 985, 986, 987, 988, 989, 990, 991, 992, and 993 shall not apply to county mutual fire insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. County Mutual Fire Reinsurers [7080. - 9060.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation and Organization [7080. - 7093.]

7080.

Five or more insurers, operating under Chapter 5 of this part and having insurance liabilities exceeding a total of $150,000 which they wish to reinsure, may incorporate for the purpose of mutual reinsurance against any loss or damage by any hazard which county mutual fire insurers may insure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 932.)
-------------------------------------------

7081.

Upon payment in advance of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) cash, lawful money of the United States, to the commissioner for all services to be rendered by him in the matter of the organization of the reinsurer, such insurers shall first file with the commissioner a declaration of their intention to incorporate such a reinsurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1917.)
-------------------------------------------

7082.

The declaration shall be signed by the president and secretary of each of the incorporators. It shall be accompanied by a certified copy of a resolution passed by the board of directors of each incorporator stating that it is the desire of the particular insurer to become one of the incorporators. Such declaration shall also contain a copy of the articles of incorporation proposed to be adopted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.

The articles shall be executed by each incorporator through its president or secretary, each signature being acknowledged as required by the general corporation law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7084.

The commissioner shall examine the proposed articles of incorporation, and if they conform to this chapter, he shall deliver to such incorporators a certificate permitting them to incorporate as such reinsurer. The certificate shall contain the proposed articles of incorporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.

Upon filing with the Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation and the certificate provided for in Section 7084, the incorporation of the reinsurer shall be complete and it may engage in business as such reinsurer upon applying for and obtaining from the commissioner a certificate of authority. The term and nature of such certificate of authority, annual renewal fee therefor, the due date and delinquent date of such fee shall be the same as provided by Article 3, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, of this code for stock and mutual insurers governed by said article. No county mutual fire reinsurer shall transact business in this State without a valid and subsisting certificate of authority as provided for herein; provided, however, that any such reinsurer presently authorized to conduct such business shall not be required to pay the first ten dollars ($10) annual certificate of authority fee until April 1, 1964.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1917.)
-------------------------------------------

7086.

Three delegates shall be elected by each member at its regular annual meeting to represent it at all meetings of the reinsurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7087.

The delegates shall be elected by ballot and shall hold office for one year, or until their successors have been elected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7088.

The annual meeting of the members of the reinsurer shall be held on the third Monday in February of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

7089.

At such meeting one director shall be elected from the delegates of each member so that the number of directors is equal to the number of members of the reinsurer. The by-laws shall fix the manner of, and time for, increasing or diminishing the number of member insurers and, correspondingly, of directors. A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7090.

In the election of the first board of directors each member insurer shall be entitled to one vote. At every subsequent election, each delegate from each member shall have as many votes as there are directors to be elected, and he may cast the votes in person or by proxy, distributing them among the directors to be elected or among a less number of directors, or cumulating them upon one candidate as he sees fit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7091.

The directors of the reinsurer shall elect from their own number a president, a vice president, and an executive committee of three. They shall also elect a treasurer and a secretary, who need not be members of any member insurer nor natural persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7092.

The directors and all of such officers shall hold office for one year from the date of their election, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

7093.

The treasurer and secretary shall give bonds to the reinsurer in such amounts as are prescribed by the board of directors, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [8010. - 8011.]

8010.

Upon organizing under its articles of incorporation, such reinsurer may carry on a fire reinsurance business as provided by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.

Such reinsurer and its directors shall possess such of the usual powers, and be subject to such of the usual duties of corporations and directors thereof as are necessary for the management of its affairs in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, including the power to prescribe the duties of its officers and fix their compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Additional Memberships [8030. - 8031.]

8030.

Any county mutual fire insurer in this State may become a member of such a reinsurer and entitled to all the rights and privileges appertaining thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

County mutual fire insurers, upon becoming members of such reinsurer, shall give it their written obligation binding themselves and their successors to pay their pro rata share of the necessary expenses and loss sustained by any member of the reinsurer during the time for which their respective policies are written. They shall also at the time of effecting the reinsurance pay such percentages and such other charges as are required by law or by the rules and by-laws of the reinsurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Risks [8050. - 8053.]

8050.

Restrictions on risks as to “distances,” “city or town block,” “closely built up district,” “one risk,” and “clear space,” in chapter 5 of this part are binding upon such reinsurers and shall govern the writing of all reinsurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

All such reinsurers shall classify the reinsured subject matter at the time of issuing policies thereon, under rates corresponding as nearly as practicable to the several kinds of subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

Such reinsurer may write reinsurance on property which is located in this State and which is insured in any member insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.

Such reinsurer shall not at any time write reinsurance, subject to one risk, in excess of five per cent of the total amount of reinsurance on its books at the time of accepting the risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Loss [8070. - 8078.]

8070.

A member of such reinsurer, upon sustaining loss covered by reinsurance, shall immediately notify the president or secretary, stating the amount of loss.
